Maryland, session 2025, HB0770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–507.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) the delivery of wine from a direct wine shipper to a consumer using a
common carrier in accordance with Title 2, Subtitle 1, Part V of this article; or
(2) the holder of a common carrier permit in the course of delivering
directly shipped wine in accordance with Title 2, Subtitle 1, Part V of this article.
(b) Retail delivery to a purchaser of alcoholic beverages is prohibited unless:
(1) a retail license holder obtains a letter of authorization from the local
licensing board to make deliveries; and
(2) the delivery is made from the licensed premises by:
(i) the retail license holder;
(ii) an employee of the retail license holder; or
(iii) a third–party contractor, an independent contractor, or an agent
that:
1. holds a local delivery service permit issued under § 4–1107
of this title; and
2. has contracted with the retail license holder to make
deliveries of alcoholic beverages.
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1901.
(a) The following sections of Title 4, Subtitle 5 (“Conduct of Local License
Holders”) of Division I of this article apply in the county without exception or variation:

HOUSE BILL 770 3
(1) § 4–502 (“Storage of alcoholic beverages”);
(2) § 4–503 (“Solicitations and sales outside of licensed premises”);
(3) § 4–505 (“Alcohol awareness program”);
(4) § 4–506 (“Evidence of purchaser’s age”); AND
[(5) § 4–507 (“Retail delivery of alcoholic beverages”); and]
[(6)] (5) § 4–508 (“Display of license”).
(b) THE FOLLOWING SECTIONS OF TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 5 (“CONDUCT OF
LOCAL LICENSE HOLDER”) OF DIVISION I OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY IN THE COUNTY:
(1) [Section] § 4–504 (“Employment of underage individuals”) [of Division
I of this article applies in the county], in addition to § 13–1902 of this subtitle; AND
(2) § 4–507 (“RETAIL DELIVERY OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES”),
SUBJECT TO § 13–1904 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–1904.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IF THE BOARD HAS ADOPTED
REGULATIONS TO AUTHORIZE THE SALE OR DELIVERY OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) IN CONSIDERING WHETHER TO ADOPT REGULATIONS UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER THE PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS OF THE SALE
OR DELIVERY OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CLASS B OR CLASS D
LICENSE THAT AUTHORIZES THE SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR
ON–PREMISES AND OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION AT A RESTAURANT OR BAR.
(2) A LICENSE HOLDER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY OBTAIN A
PERMIT FROM THE BOARD THAT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL, IF
AUTHORIZED UNDER THE HOLDER’S LICENSE, MIXED DRINKS OR COCKTAILS IN
SEALED OR CLOSED CONTAINERS FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION OR DELIVERY
IF:
(I) THE MIXED DRINK OR COCKTAIL IS PURCHASED ALONG
WITH PREPARED FOOD OTHER THAN PREPACKAGED SNACKS;

HOUSE BILL 770
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL PURCHASING THE MIXED DRINK OR
COCKTAIL:
1. IS AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD;
2. PROVIDES VALID IDENTIFICATION AS PROOF OF AGE;
AND
3. IF THE SALE IS FOR DELIVERY, PROVIDES ANY
DOCUMENTATION THAT THE BOARD REQUIRES;
(III) EACH MIXED DRINK OR COCKTAIL SOLD FOR OFF–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION OR DELIVERY IS:
1. PROVIDED IN THE MANUFACTURER’S ORIGINAL
SEALED CONTAINER OR IN A CONTAINER CLOSED WITH A CAP, CORK, SEAL, OR LID
WITH NO HOLES FOR STRAWS OR SIPPING; AND
2. SOLD OR DELIVERED NOT LATER THAN 11 P.M.;
(IV) THE DELIVERY OF AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE IS MADE FROM
THE LICENSED PREMISES TO THE INDIVIDUAL PURCHASING THE ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGE BY THE LICENSE HOLDER OR THE LICENSE HOLDER’S EMPLOYEE WHO IS
AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD AND CERTIFIED IN AN ALCOHOL AWARENESS PROGRAM;
AND
(V) THE MIXED DRINK OR COCKTAIL IS NOT DELIVERED TO:
1. ANOTHER PREMISES LICENSED TO SELL ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES; OR
2. AN ADDRESS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE COUNTY.
(C) THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT CHARGE A LICENSE HOLDER AN ADDITIONAL FEE FOR
SELLING OR DELIVERING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) MAY LIMIT THE QUANTITY OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES THAT MAY
BE SOLD OR DELIVERED UNDER THIS SECTION TO AN INDIVIDUAL IN A SINGLE
TRANSACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.